Hawaii statutes.
[§425R-8] Change of name or address by
noncommercial registered agent. (a) If a noncommercial registered agent
changes its name or its address as currently in effect with respect to a
represented entity pursuant to section 425R-4(a), the agent shall file with the
director, with respect to each entity represented by the agent, a certified
statement of change signed by or on behalf of the agent that states:

(1) The name of the entity;

(2) The name and address of the agent as currently in
effect with respect to the entity;

(3) If the name of the agent has changed, its new
name; and

(4) If the address of the agent has changed, the new
address.

(b) A statement of change filed under this
section takes effect on filing.

(c) A noncommercial registered agent shall
promptly furnish the represented entity with notice in a record of the filing
of a statement of change and the changes made by the filing. [L 2009, c 55, pt
of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next